Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. General Provisions; Polling Places.
§ 24.2-611.
Form and signing of pollbooks; records of persons voting; electronic pollbooks.

The following oath shall be on a form prescribed by the State Board, administered to all officers of election, and kept by the officers of election with the pollbook:“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will perform the duties for this election according to law and the best of my ability, and that I will studiously endeavor to prevent fraud, deceit, and abuse in conducting this election.”The oath shall be administered to each officer of election by the general registrar, a member of the electoral board, or an officer of election designated by the general registrar and secretary of the electoral board, who shall be so identified on the form. The oath shall be signed by each officer of election and the person administering the oath. The pollbook shall be marked to identify the election for which it is used.

The Department shall provide the pollbook pursuant to subdivision A 7 of §

24.2-404

. The pollbook shall (i) provide a space for the officer of election to record the name and consecutive number of the voter at the time he offers to vote and (ii) be retained in accordance with the provisions governing pollbooks in this title. The Department shall make available a numerical check sheet required to be used with pollbooks in printed form to determine the consecutive number to be recorded with the name of the voter by the officer of election. In electronic pollbooks, the consecutive number shall be entered automatically when the officer of election records that the voter has voted. When the name and number of the last qualified voter have been entered on the pollbook, the officer of election responsible for that pollbook shall sign a statement on the check sheet, or on a separate form if an electronic pollbook is used, certifying the number of qualified registrants who have voted. The Department shall provide instructions to the local electoral boards, general registrars, and officers of election for the conduct of the election and for procedures for entering a voting record for each voter and recording each voter’s name, including voters unable to enter the polling place, and for verifying the accurate entry of the voting record for each registrant on the Virginia Voter Registration System. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, for any election held on or after November 1, 2020, all pollbooks provided by the Department shall be in electronic form only.

The Department shall incorporate safeguards to assure that the records of the election, including the pollbook, voter count sheets, or other alternative records, will provide promptly an accurate and secure record of those who have voted.

Any locality may expend its own funds to purchase electronic pollbooks that have been approved for use in elections by the State Board.

The general registrar shall produce a paper copy of the pollbook specified in subsection B for each precinct in any primary or general election.

In the event that the electronic pollbooks for a precinct fail to operate properly and no alternative voter list or pollbook is available, the officers of election, in accordance with the instructions and materials approved by the State Board, shall (i) maintain a written list of the persons voting and (ii) provide to each person voting a provisional ballot to be cast as provided in §

24.2-653

.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-257; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-135; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1976, c. 616; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 425; 1993, c. 641; 1994, c. 321; 1999, c. 810; 2000, c. 2; 2001, c. 839; 2002, cc. 66, 216, 785, 819; 2003, c. 1015; 2008, cc. 88, 424; 2010, c. 812; 2011, c. 810; 2020, c. 297.

The 1999 amendment

added subsection C.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 2, effective February 1, 2000, in subsection C, substituted “July 1, 2001” for “January 1, 2000” at the end of the second sentence; and inserted “and 2001” following “year 2000” and substituted “Sessions” for “Session” near the end of the last sentence.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 837, in subsection C, substituted “2003” for “2001” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “any committee established by the General Assembly for the purpose of studying the use of a combined precinct registered voter list and pollbook and to the General Assembly prior to the 2003 Regular Session” for “the Committee on Privileges and Elections of the General Assembly prior to the year 2000 and 2001 Regular Sessions of the General Assembly” in the last sentence.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 66 and 216 are identical, and added subsection D.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and in the third paragraph of subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “a member” for “the secretary,” and substituted “the general registrar and secretary of the electoral board” for “them.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015 rewrote the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 88 and 424 are identical, and added subsection D.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 812, effective November 1, 2010, in subsection B, substituted “the State Board shall make available” for “if the pollbook is provided in printed form, the State Board shall provide,” “required to be used with pollbooks in printed form” for “to be used,” and “in electronic pollbooks” for “If the pollbook is provided in electronic form,” and added the last sentence; and in subsection C, deleted the last two sentences, which read: “The State Board may provide for the pollbook to be in a paper format or in an electronic format if funds are appropriated to cover the costs associated with the provision of a pollbook in an electronic format. The State Board shall be authorized to conduct pilot programs in one or more localities, with the consent of the electoral board of the locality, to test the use of an electronic pollbook in one or more precincts, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 810 added subsection E.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 297, in subsections B and C, substituted “Department” for “State Board” wherever it appears, in subsection B, substituted “2020” for “2010” in the last sentence, inserted a new subsection E, and redesignated former subsection E as subsection F.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).